Connecticut, session 2026, HB05313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Chief
Court Administrator, or the administrator's designee, in consultation
with the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
the executive director of the Criminal Justice Information System
Governing Board, established under section 54-142 of the general
statutes, the Chief State's Attorney, the judges of the superior court
assigned to the state's domestic violence dockets under section 51-181e
of the general statutes and the membership of the Domestic Violence
Criminal Justice Response and Enhancement Advisory Council,
established pursuant to section 46b-38j of the general statutes, shall
develop a plan for implementation and use of a uniform state-wide case
identification code or codes for any domestic violence case included in
any electronic data system of case files maintained by the Judicial
Branch, the Division of Criminal Justice and the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection. As used in this section,
"domestic violence case" means a criminal matter, involving family
violence, as defined in section 46b-38a of the general statutes, between

Substitute House Bill No. 5313
a family or household member, as defined in section 46b-38a of the
general statutes, irrespective of the underlying criminal offense charged.
(b) The state-wide case identification code or codes developed
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be designed to: (1) Apply
a consistent identifier to any domestic violence case that is a criminal
matter within the electronic data systems of criminal case files
maintained by the Judicial Branch, the Division of Criminal Justice and
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection; (2)
improve the identification, consistency and analysis of domestic
violence cases for state-wide reporting, oversight, policy evaluation
purposes and aggregate data collection and analysis; and (3) be fully
compliant with federal and state law confidentiality requirements.
(c) On or before July 1, 2027, the Chief Court Administrator, or said
administrator's designee, shall submit the plan and an accompanying
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary and public safety.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Special Act No. 26-8 2 of 2